Tennessee, session 114, SB0118.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 66-29-165(b), is amended by
designating the existing language as subdivision (b)(1) and adding the following as subdivision
(b)(2):
(2) The report may be submitted electronically.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB0118
000993
- 1 -